Utah statutes.
59-14-508.   Federal laws to supersede these requirements.

In the event federal legislation requiring warning labels on smokeless tobacco products is enacted, the requirements of that legislation shall supersede the requirements of Sections 59-14-501 through 59-14-507.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 1987 General Session

